Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.400

Maturity—Interest—Payment.

(1) Such bonds shall be issued only in pursuance of ordinances of the city directing the issuance of the same, and by their terms shall be made payable on or before a date not to exceed twelve years from and after their date, which latter date may be fixed by resolution or ordinance by council or other legislative body of said city and shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be authorized by the council or other legislative body of said city, which interest shall be payable annually, or semiannually, as may be provided by resolution or ordinance: PROVIDED, That the legislative body of any city of the first class having a population of three hundred thousand inhabitants, or more, issuing any bonds hereunder may by ordinance, passed by unanimous vote, authorize the issuance of such bonds payable on or before a date not to exceed twenty-two years from and after the date of the issue of such bonds, and shall in such ordinance provide that said bonds shall be sold at not less than par and shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be authorized by the legislative body.

Such bonds shall be in such denominations as shall be provided in the resolution or ordinance authorizing their issuance and shall be numbered from one upwards, consecutively, and each bond and any coupon shall be signed by the mayor and attested by the clerk or comptroller of such city: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That any coupons may in lieu of being so signed have printed thereon a facsimile of the signature of said officers and each bond shall have the seal of such city affixed thereto and shall refer to the improvement to pay for which the same shall be issued and to the ordinance authorizing the same. Each bond shall provide that the principal sum therein named, and the interest thereon, shall be payable out of the local improvement fund created for the payment of the cost and expense of such improvement, and not otherwise. Such bonds shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the cost and expense of the improvement. The bonds may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1983 c 167 s 12; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 64; 1925 ex.s. c 115 s 1; 1915 c 154 s 11; RRS s 9263.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.